Utah statutes.
72-4-119.   State highways -- SR-132 to SR-134, SR-136 to SR-140.
State highways include:
(1)  SR-132.  From Route 6 in Lynndyl northeasterly through Leamington to
Nephi; then southeasterly through Fountain Green and Moroni to Route 89 at
Pigeon Hollow Junction.
(2)  SR-133.  From Kanosh south city limits north through Meadow to Route 15
north of Meadow.
(3)  SR-134.  From Route 37 at Kanesville northerly to Plain City; then
easterly to Route 235 in North Ogden.
(4)  SR-136.  From a junction with Route 50 and 125 east of Delta north to
Route 6.
(5)  SR-137.  From Route 89 in Gunnison easterly to Mayfield; then northerly
to Route 89.
(6)  SR-138.  From Route 80 at Stansbury Interchange southeasterly through
Grantsville to Route 36 at Mills Junction.
(7)  SR-139.  From Route 6 northerly to Route 157 near Spring Glen.
(8)  SR-140.  From Route 68 at Bluffdale easterly coincident with the
Bluffdale Road to the on and off access ramps on the east side of Route 15.
